Utah statutes.
77-40-106.   Application for certificate of eligibility -- Fees.
(1) (a)  A petitioner seeking to obtain an expungement for a criminal record
shall apply for a certificate of eligibility from the bureau.
(b)  A petitioner who intentionally or knowingly provides any false or
misleading information to the bureau when applying for a certificate of
eligibility is guilty of a class B misdemeanor and subject to prosecution
under Section 76-8-504.6.
(c)  Regardless of whether the petitioner is prosecuted, the bureau may deny a
certificate of eligibility to anyone providing false information on an
application.
(2) (a)  The bureau shall perform a check of records of governmental agencies,
including national criminal data bases, to determine whether a petitioner is
eligible to receive a certificate of eligibility under this chapter.
(b)  For purposes of determining eligibility under this chapter, the bureau
may review records of arrest, investigation, detention and conviction that
have been previously expunged, regardless of the jurisdiction in which the
expungement occurred.
(c)  If the petitioner meets all of the criteria under Section 77-40-104 or
77-40-105, the bureau shall issue a certificate of eligibility to the
petitioner which shall be valid for a period of 90 days from the date the
certificate is issued.
(d)  If, after reasonable research, a disposition for an arrest on the
criminal history file is unobtainable, the bureau may issue a special
certificate giving determination of eligibility to the court.
(3) (a)  The bureau shall charge application and issuance fees for a
certificate of eligibility in accordance with the process in Section
63J-1-504.
(b)  The application fee shall be paid at the time the petitioner submits an
application for a certificate of eligibility to the bureau.
(c)  If the bureau determines that the issuance of a certificate of
eligibility is appropriate, the petitioner will be charged an additional fee
for the issuance of a certificate of eligibility unless Subsection (3)(d)
applies.
(d)  An issuance fee may not be assessed against a petitioner who qualifies
for a certificate of eligibility under Section 77-40-104 unless the charges
were dismissed pursuant to a plea in abeyance agreement under Title 77,
Chapter 2a, Pleas in Abeyance, or a diversion agreement under Title 77,
Chapter 2, Prosecution, Screening, and Diversion.
(e)  Funds generated under this Subsection (3) shall be deposited in the
General Fund as a dedicated credit by the department to cover the costs
incurred in determining eligibility.
